District of Columbia statutes.
42-3671.05

Maintenance of the property.

During the rental term, the lessor shall maintain the property in good working condition, including repairing or replacing, if repair cannot be completed within a reasonable time, any property which fails to perform as a result of a defect in the property not caused by harmful conditions outside the merchant’s or manufacturer’s control or by improper use by the consumer, as long as no other person has been permitted to repair it. The merchant may, but shall not be required, to repair or replace property which has been damaged by the negligent or intentional act of the consumer.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-99, § 6, 49 DCR 1000